District of Columbia statutes.
31-1207

Records.

The Mayor shall, at all reasonable times, make books, records, and files available to insurance company representatives for the purpose of examining any matter coming within the scope of the chapter and the insurance laws of the District of Columbia.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-40, § 8, 40 DCR 6009

History

1981 Ed., § 35-2707.

Prior Codifications